California statutes. Public Utilities Code
  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [12051. - 12055.]

12051.

The general manager shall adopt a civil service system for the selection, examination, employment, classification, advancement, suspension, and discharge of employees included in the “district civil service.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12052.

The general manager shall adopt rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of the civil service provisions of this division and may from time to time amend existing rules. Except as otherwise provided herein such rules shall govern applications, examinations, eligibility, duration of eligible lists; certifications of eligibles; appointments; promotions; transfers; resignations; layoffs or reductions in force, both permanent and temporary, due to lack of work or funds, retrenchment, or completion of work; the filling of positions, temporary, seasonal, and permanent; classification; and such other matters as are not in conflict with the civil service provisions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12053.

The rules and regulations or any proposed amendments thereto shall be in writing and a copy thereof shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the office of the district and shall not become effective until 20 days after the posting thereof. The board may require that such rules and regulations or amendments thereof be submitted to it for approval prior to posting. Any person interested may within 10 days after such posting file written objections to such proposed rules or amendments, or any part thereof, with the general manager, in which event the rules or amendments shall not become effective until the general manager has given notice of a hearing and heard objections thereto and announced his decision on the objections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12054.

The civil service provisions of this chapter do not apply to any district until such time as it has operated, controlled, or used works or parts of works for the providing of any of the utility services specified in this division. A civil service system may, however, be adopted at any time after the district commences to operate, control, or use works or parts of works for the providing of any of the utility services specified in this division, and such system shall be adopted within six months thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12055.

The “district civil service” includes every employee of the district except all of the following:

(a) Officers elected by the people.

(b) Officers, assistant officers, and other persons and employees appointed by the board of directors.

(c) Temporary construction employees.

(d) Part-time employees.

(e) The unfilled positions (not to exceed 15) requiring peculiar and exceptional qualifications, including those of a scientific, professional, or expert character or of special confidence, as may be exempted from “district civil service” upon the recommendation of the general manager approved by the board.

(f) Limited-term employees appointed for a period not to exceed two years. Limited-term appointments may be extended for an additional period not to exceed two years upon approval of the general manager.

(g) Employees occupying positions determined to be exempt from the district civil service pursuant to Section 11887.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 10.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointments [12101. - 12104.]

12101.

All appointments under the civil service system shall be made for the good of the public service and solely on the basis of integrity, character, merit, fitness, and industry as established by appropriate competitive tests, without regard to partisan, political, social, or other considerations, and shall be made from lists of eligibles prepared by the general manager.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

(a) When no list of eligibles is available for a position in the class requisitioned by the department or division head, the general manager may make a noncivil service appointment thereto for a period of not exceeding six months and only until a regular appointment can be made, but no person shall be compensated under a noncivil service appointment, or appointments, for a period exceeding six months in any fiscal or calendar year, and no office or employment may be filled by a noncivil service appointment for more than six months in the aggregate in one fiscal or calendar year.

(b) This section does not apply to a district which has owned or operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.1.

When no list of eligibles is available for a position in the class requisitioned by the department or division head, the general manager of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may make a noncivil service appointment thereto for a period of not exceeding 12 months and only until a regular appointment can be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

The general manager may make appointments to higher positions exclusively promotional by tests from lower ranks.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

Every appointee to a permanent position shall be on probation for six months, except that the general manager may establish a probationary period for up to 12 months for professional, scientific, technical, administrative, management, or executive positions, or for positions requiring certification by the state pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 13625) of Division 7 of the Water Code. The general manager may terminate the appointment during the probationary period. If the appointment is not then terminated it shall be permanent, subject to this division and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Blanketing-In [12131. - 12134.]

12131.

The incumbents of permanent positions who have held such positions for a period of at least six months continuously next preceding the time that a civil service system is first adopted shall be continued in their positions as if appointed thereto after examination and certification from a list of eligibles, and shall be governed thereafter by this division and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto but shall not be subject to the six months’ probation period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12132.

Whenever any district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, whether by proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, any or all of the officers or employees of such public utility whose duties pertained to the facilities acquired may be appointed to positions in the district’s civil service system without examination and certification from a list of eligibles and shall be governed thereafter by this division and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto but shall not be subject to the six months’ probation period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12133.

If a civil service system is adopted for a district during the period of a leave of absence granted under Section 395.4 of the Military and Veterans Code or similar legislation, the officer or employee shall, on the termination of his leave of absence, be restored to a position in the district’s civil service system wherein he shall have the same or equivalent status as of the last working day before his leave of absence began. The officer or employee shall hold that position as if appointed thereto after examination and certification from a list of eligibles, and shall be governed thereafter by the rules and regulations of the civil service system, except that if such officer or employee had held a permanent position with the district for a period of six months continuously next preceding the beginning of his leave of absence, he shall not be subject to the six months’ probation period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12134.

Whenever a district acquires existing facilities from a public utility, whether by proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, any officer or employee of the public utility who left a permanent position with such utility pertaining principally to the facilities acquired in order to perform training and service under the Selective Training and Service Act of 1940 shall be entitled to be appointed to a position with permanent status in the district’s civil service under the same conditions as would have governed his right to reinstatement with the public utility under Section 8 (b) of that act if the district had not acquired those facilities.

No civil service status acquired by other officers or employees of the district shall prevent their removal by layoff or transfer from positions to which reinstatement is provided for in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Discipline [12161. - 12167.]

12161.

No person employed under civil service provisions of this division or of any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto in a permanent position shall be removed, discharged, or suspended except for cause.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12162.

Removal or discharge may be made for any of the following causes: incompetence, habitual intemperance, immoral conduct, insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public, dishonesty, or inattention to public service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12163.

The department or division head may for disciplinary purposes suspend a subordinate for a period of not exceeding 15 days and suspension shall carry with it a loss of salary for the period of suspension.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12164.

Within five days after the mailing of written notice of removal, discharge, or suspension, any employee may file a written request with the general manager for an opportunity to be heard in his own defense or, at the employee’s option, may utilize a grievance procedure if the district and a recognized employee organization have agreed after meeting and conferring in good faith pursuant to Section 3505 of the Government Code that a grievance procedure may be used in disciplinary proceedings involving removals, discharges, and suspensions as an alternative to the procedure provided for in Sections 12165 and 12166.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1217, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12165.

When such request is made the general manager shall immediately appoint from officers or assistant officers of the district (other than elected officials), or heads of departments or divisions, a committee of three to hear and determine such charges and shall notify the person accused of the time and place when the charges will be heard by mailing a notice to his last known address.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12166.

The committee shall examine into the case and make such decision as it deems just and may among other things order the employee discharged, suspended, or reinstated. Its order or decision shall be final unless the employee within 10 days after the date of the order requests the general manager to review the order, in which event the general manager may require any additional evidence he deems material, and his order or decision, with or without such additional evidence, shall be final.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12167.

Nothing in the civil service provisions of this division deprives any person of his rights and remedies in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [12301. - 12392.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [12301. - 12307.]

12301.

The board may establish a retirement system for the officers, whether elective or appointive, or both, and employees of the district and provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement allowances, disability payments, and death benefits, or any of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 530, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.

The district may maintain its own retirement fund or may provide for benefits to eligible officers and employees, or their beneficiaries, by means of group insurance or other insurance, or by such means as in the opinion of the board will satisfactorily provide an adequate and sure method of meeting the payments contemplated by the retirement system.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.

Before establishing any retirement system the board shall secure a report from a qualified actuary, which shall show the cost of the benefits provided by the system, and the prospective assets and liabilities of the system.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.

The board may adopt all ordinances and resolutions and perform all acts necessary or convenient to the initiation, maintenance, and administration of the retirement system.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.

A district may make all or part of its officers, whether elective or appointive, or both, and employees members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System by contract entered into between the district and the board of administration of the system under the Public Employees’ Retirement Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code); and the district may perform all acts necessary or convenient for that participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.

The board may classify and determine the officers, whether elective or appointive, or both, and employees who shall be included as members in the retirement system and may change the classification from time to time. Membership of all officers and employees so classified and included in the retirement system is compulsory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 530, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a participant in a deferred compensation plan may also participate in the district’s retirement system, and, in ascertaining the amount of compensation of such participant, for purposes of computing the amount of his contributions or benefits under the district’s retirement system, any amount deducted from his wages pursuant to Section 12338 shall be included.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits and Contributions [12331. - 12338.]

12331.

The board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the officers and employees of the district or their beneficiaries shall be entitled to benefits and the amounts thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12332.

The retirement allowance may be predicated in part upon service rendered the district by a member prior to the establishment of the retirement system, which service is known as “prior service.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12333.

The board shall provide that both the district and the members shall contribute to the retirement system. Based on tables and assumptions adopted by the board, it shall fix the rates of contributions by officers and employees of the district who are members of the retirement system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

12334.

All members of the retirement system shall contribute in the manner and amount fixed by the board and such contributions may be collected by deducting the amounts thereof from the salary, wages, or compensation due such members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12335.

Liabilities accruing under the retirement system because of benefits other than such as are the equivalent of contributions by the members, with accumulated interest, shall be met by contributions by the district. Prior service or other liabilities of the district may be met by annual appropriations instead of by one appropriation for the total of the liabilities; but until the present value of regular contributions for current service, together with assets then available, equals the present value of all allowances and benefits granted or to be granted under the system, the appropriation for any one year when added to any unused balance of any previous appropriations for such purpose shall not be less than the amount disbursed during that year on account of prior service or other liabilities of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12336.

If any member withdraws from the retirement system prior to retirement the total amount contributed by him with such interest as may be credited thereto shall be returned to him; provided, however, that the board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which a member, whose district service is terminated except by death or retirement, may elect to leave his contributions and interest thereon in the retirement fund, and the terms and conditions upon which a retirement allowance may be made to him after such termination based upon his contributions prior to such termination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

12337.

All money received by any person as an annuity, pension, retirement allowance, disability payment, or death benefit from the retirement system, and all contributions and interest thereon returned to any member of the retirement system, whether in the actual possession of such person or deposited, loaned, or invested by him, is unassignable, and is exempt from execution or any other process except to the extent permitted by Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 164.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

12337.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 12337, the retirement board may comply with and give effect to a revocable written authorization signed by a retired member or beneficiary of a retired member entitled to a retirement allowance or benefit under this chapter, authorizing the district to deduct appropriate amounts from the retirement allowance or benefit payable to any such retired member or beneficiary of a retired member for the purpose of paying premiums of any group medical or hospital service plan, or both, approved by the district, for the benefit of such retired member or his dependents, for the payment of personal income taxes to the Government of the United States or of the State of California, or for the purchase of shares in, or the payment of money to, the utility district credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

12338.

Nothing in this division shall prevent a district from establishing a deferred compensation plan for some or all of its officers and employees pursuant to Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 53212) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Retirement Board [12361. - 12368.]

12361.

The board shall create a retirement board of not more than five members, at least two members of which shall be the elected representatives of the employees, to administer the retirement system, and shall define its powers and duties and the tenure of the members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12362.

All members of the retirement board shall serve without pay.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12363.

The retirement board shall determine the eligibility of officers, employees, and their dependents to participation in the system and shall be the sole authority and judge under such ordinances as may be adopted by the board as to the conditions under which persons may be admitted to and continue to receive benefits of any sort under the retirement system, and may modify allowances for service and disability. The determination of the retirement board shall be final and conclusive and shall not be modified or set aside except for fraud or abuse of discretion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12364.

If the district maintains its own retirement fund, the retirement board shall have exclusive control of the administration, investment, and disbursement of the retirement fund. The retirement fund is a trust fund held for the exclusive purposes of providing benefits to members of the retirement system and their survivors and beneficiaries. Investment of the fund shall be subject to the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1738, Sec. 33.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12365.6.

In addition to such other investments that are authorized by this article, the retirement board may, in its discretion, invest the assets of the retirement fund in deeds of trust and mortgages. Investments made under this section shall not exceed, in the aggregate, an amount equal to 25 percent of the assets of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12365.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the retirement board, or the district’s treasurer with the approval of the retirement board, may enter into security loan agreements with broker-dealers and with California or national banks for the purpose of prudently supplementing the income normally received from investments.

(b) “Security loan agreement” means a written contract whereby a legal owner, the lender, agrees to lend specific marketable corporate or government securities for a period not to exceed one year. The lender retains the right to collect from the borrower all dividends, interest, premiums, rights, and any other distributions to which the lender would otherwise have been entitled. The lender waives the right to vote the securities during the term of the loan. The lender may terminate the contract upon not more than five business days’ notice as agreed, and the borrower may terminate the contract upon not less than two business days’ notice as agreed. The borrower shall provide collateral to the lender in the form of cash or bonds or other interest-bearing notes and obligations of the United States or federal instrumentalities eligible for investment by a lending retirement fund.

The collateral shall be in an amount equal to at least 102 percent of the market value of the loaned securities as agreed. The lender shall monitor the market value of the loaned securities daily. The loan agreement shall provide for payment of additional collateral on a daily basis, or at the time the value of the loaned securities increases, to agreed-upon ratios. In no event shall the amount of the collateral be less than the market value of the loaned securities.

(c) “Marketable securities” means securities that are freely traded on recognized exchanges or marketplaces.

(d) The retirement board or district treasurer entering into security loan agreements shall do all of the following:

(1) Maintain detailed records of all security loans.

(2) Develop controls and reports to monitor the conduct of the transactions. 

(3) Publicize the net results of the security loan transaction separate from the results of other investment activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12365.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the retirement system may invest in any and all investments authorized by Section 1372 of the Financial Code and Section 12871 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 484, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12366.

Notwithstanding Section 12364, the retirement board may contract with one or more qualified investment managers in connection with the investment program of the retirement board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1738, Sec. 37.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12367.

The retirement board may authorize a trust company or a trust department of any state or national bank authorized to conduct the business of a trust company in this state or the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco or any branch thereof within this state, to act as custodian of any securities invested in by the retirement board. Any such bank or trust company may be authorized to collect the income from such securities or the proceeds of the sale thereof for the retirement board, and deposit said income or funds in the account of the retirement system. The compensation of such bank or trust company for such custodial services shall be fixed by agreement and shall be paid in the same manner and from the same funds as are other costs of administration of the retirement system. Securities of the retirement fund held by the custodian bank or trust company may be registered in the nominee name of the custodian or of the retirement system. The custodian bank or trust company shall make such disposition of the securities as the retirement board shall authorize. All such securities are at all times subject to the order of the retirement board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

12368.

Funds held by a district pursuant to a written agreement between the district and the employees of the district to defer a portion of the compensation otherwise receivable by the district’s employees and pursuant to a plan for such deferral as adopted by the board, may be invested in the types of investments set forth in Section 53609 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investigation and Penalties [12391. - 12392.]

12391.

At least once in each four-year period after the establishment of the retirement system the board shall cause to be made an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement fund, and upon the basis of such investigation and valuation shall make such revision or change of the rates of contribution, the periods and conditions of service, and amounts of retirement allowances as may be necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12392.

Except as herein provided, no member of the board or of the retirement board, nor any member of the retirement system or employee of the district, shall have any interest direct or indirect in the making of any investment or in the gains or profits accruing therefrom, and no such person, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent or partner of others, shall borrow any of its funds, nor shall any such person in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the retirement board, nor shall such a person become an endorser or surety as to, or in any manner an obligor for investments of the retirement fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [12701. - 13024.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [12701. - 12703.]

12701.

A district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12702.

A district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12702.5.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), any judicial action or proceeding against a district that provides electric utility service, to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul an ordinance, resolution, or motion fixing or changing a rate or charge for an electric commodity or an electric service furnished by a district and adopted on or after July 1, 2000, shall be commenced within 120 days of the effective date of that ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(b) The
 statute of limitations specified in subdivision (a) does not apply to any judicial action or proceeding filed pursuant to Chapter 13.7 (commencing with Section 54999) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code to protest or challenge a rate or charge or to seek the refund of a capital facilities fee if the notice and disclosure requirements of Section 54999.35 of the Government Code have not been followed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 178.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

12703.

A district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [12721. - 12723.]

12721.

A district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12722.

Neither the general manager nor any director of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom. Any violation of this provision is a misdemeanor, and conviction shall work a forfeiture of office. This section has no application to contracts awarded to corporations in which such officer owns less than 1 percent of the entire capital stock.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12723.

Whenever the board, by resolution passed by a majority of its members, determines that the public interest will be served, a district constructing or operating plants and appurtenant facilities for the generation of electrical power by nuclear energy may purchase or acquire insurance for such properties against physical loss or damage and the resultant loss of capacity for the generation of electrical power from insurance companies organized in the United States or foreign countries as either stock companies or assessment or nonassessment mutual companies. In the event such insurance is acquired from an assessment mutual company, a district shall have authority to share in
 the initial organization expenses of the company, to become a member of the company, and to assume liability for retrospective premium adjustments in accordance with the terms and conditions of the policy or contract of insurance issued by such company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Purchases [12751. - 12753.]

12751.

(a) Except as specified in Section 12751.5, the purchase of all supplies and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or in a district that has a population of 250,000 or more, when the expenditure required exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. Notice requesting bids shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code at least 10 days before bids are received. The district may reject any and all bids and readvertise
 in its discretion. The board may authorize the general manager to determine, in the discretion of the general manager, whether to reject all bids and whether, after the bids have been rejected, to readvertise.

(b) The dollar limit identified in subdivision (a) shall annually be adjusted upward or downward to reflect the percentage change in the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the U.S. Department of Commerce. The annual adjustments shall be rounded to the nearest one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 55, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12751.1.

Notwithstanding Section 12751, the board of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may authorize the general manager to determine the lowest responsible bidder and to award a contract to that bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

12751.2.

Notwithstanding Section 12751, the board of a district which has owned and operated water distribution or sewage disposal systems for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may authorize the general manager to act for the board in determining the lowest responsible bidder and awarding a contract to that bidder where the expenditure required by the bid price is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). When acting pursuant to this section, the general manager shall, in each instance, promptly notify the board of the action
 taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12751.3.

(a) The purpose of this section is to provide affected districts with an alternative acquisition process that will result in reduced costs to ratepayers. Notwithstanding Section 12751, when the expenditure for the purchase of supplies and materials exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and the district determines that ratepayers reasonably can expect a net benefit in the cost of district services, the district may provide for the purchase of the supplies and materials by contract let in accordance with best value at the lowest cost
 acquisition policies adopted by the board pursuant to this section.

(b) The best value at the lowest cost acquisition policies adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include the following:

(1) Price and service level proposals that reduce the district’s overall operating costs.

(2) Supplies and materials standards that support the district’s strategic supplies and materials acquisition and management program direction.

(3) A procedure for protest and resolution.

(c) For purposes of this section, “best value at the lowest cost acquisition” means a competitive procurement process whereby the award of a contract for supplies and materials may take into consideration any of the following
 factors:

(1) The total cost to the district of its use or consumption of supplies and materials.

(2) The operational cost or benefit incurred by the district as a result of the contract award.

(3) The value to the district of vendor-added services.

(4) The quality, effectiveness, and innovation of supplies, materials, and services.

(5) The reliability of delivery or installation schedules.

(6) The terms and conditions of product warranties and vendor guarantees.

(7) The financial stability of the vendor.

(8) The vendor’s quality assurance program.

(9) The vendor’s experience with the provision of supplies, materials, and services.

(10) The consistency of the vendor’s proposed supplies, materials, and services with the district’s overall supplies and materials procurement program.

(11) The economic benefits to the general community related to job creation or retention.

(d) If a district that did not purchase supplies and materials by contract let pursuant to this section before January 1, 2006, elects to purchase supplies and materials by contract, let in accordance with best value acquisition policies adopted by the board pursuant to this section, the district shall submit a report to the Legislative Analyst on or before January 1, 2011.
 The district shall include in the report a summary of the costs and benefits of best value acquisition compared to traditional low bid procurement practices. The report shall also include statistics showing the number of contracts awarded to small businesses, minority-owned businesses, and new businesses and the number of years each contract awardee had been in business. The report shall also include an analysis of the effects of best value procurement practices on these businesses, the nature of any disputes arising from the use of best value procurement practices, and the status of those disputes. On or before April 1, 2011, the Legislative Analyst shall report to the Legislature on the use of “best value at lowest cost acquisition” procurement practices used by municipal utility districts, and recommend whether to modify this section and extend the authority of additional districts to elect to purchase supplies and materials by contract let in accordance with best value acquisition policies, beyond
 January 1, 2012.

(e) The district shall ensure that all businesses have a fair and equitable opportunity to compete for, and participate in, district contracts and shall also ensure that discrimination in the award and performance of contracts does not occur on the basis of marital status, ancestry, medical condition, any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, or retaliation for having filed a discrimination complaint in the performance of district contractual obligations.

(f) A district that did not purchase supplies and materials by contract let pursuant to this section before January 1, 2006, shall not purchase supplies and materials by contract let pursuant to this section after January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12752.
